fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-1-miteh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xêrox:
    Gên: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mitêh - ok : # -m inanimatê dêpêndênt noun, heart	AEW C-initial NDI1
     mitêh+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: mitêh
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitêh
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitêh
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nitêhinân
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kitêhinaw
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kitêhiwâw
     
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: otêh
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: otêhiwâw
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: otêhiyiw

     mitêh+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: mitêha
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nitêha
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kitêha
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nitêhinâna
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kitêhinawa
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kitêhiwâwa
     
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: otêha
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: otêhiwâwa
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: otêhiyiwa

     mitêh+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: mitêhihk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nitêhihk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kitêhihk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nitêhinâhk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kitêhinâhk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kitêhiwâhk

     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: otêhihk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: otêhiwâhk
     mitêh+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otêhiyihk

     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [micêhis,     micêhisis]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicêhis,     nicêhisis]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicêhis,     kicêhisis]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicêhisinân, nicêhisisinân]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicêhisinaw, kicêhisisinaw]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicêhisiwâw, kicêhisisiwâw]

     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [ocêhis,     ocêhisis]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [ocêhisiwâw, ocêhisisiwâw]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [ocêhisiyiw, ocêhisisiyiw]

     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [micêhisa,     micêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicêhisa,     nicêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicêhisa,     kicêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicêhisinâna, nicêhisisinâna]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicêhisinawa, kicêhisisinawa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicêhisiwâwa, kicêhisisiwâwa]
     
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [ocêhisa,      ocêhisisa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [ocêhisiwâwa,  ocêhisisiwâwa]
     mitêh+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [ocêhisiyiwa,  ocêhisisiyiwa]
